Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Registrars.

§ 24.2-110.
Appointment, qualifications, and term of general registrar; vacancies; certain prohibitions.

Each electoral board shall meet in the month of May or June in 2007, and every four years thereafter, and shall appoint a general registrar, who shall be a qualified voter of the county or city for which he is appointed unless such county or city has a population of 50,000 or less. In the case of a city that is wholly contained within one county, the city electoral board may appoint a qualified voter of that county to serve as city general registrar. General registrars shall serve four-year terms beginning July 1, 2007, and each fourth year thereafter, and continue in office until a successor is appointed and qualifies.

The electoral board shall fill any vacancy in the office of general registrar for the unexpired term. The electoral board shall declare vacant and fill the office of the general registrar if the appointee fails to qualify and deliver a copy of his oath to the secretary of the electoral board within 30 days after he has been notified of his appointment.

No general registrar shall hold any other office, by election or appointment, while serving as general registrar; however, with the consent of the electoral board, he may undertake other duties which do not conflict with his duties as general registrar. General registrars shall not serve as officers of election. The election or appointment of a general registrar to any other office shall vacate the office of the general registrar.

No general registrar shall be eligible to offer for or hold an office to be filled by election in whole or in part by the qualified voters of his jurisdiction at any election held during the time he serves as general registrar or for the six months thereafter.

The electoral board shall not appoint to the office of general registrar any person who is the spouse of an electoral board member or any person, or the spouse of any person, who is the parent, grandparent, sibling, child, or grandchild of an electoral board member.

No general registrar shall serve as the chairman of a political party or other officer of a state, local or district level political party committee. No general registrar shall serve as a paid or volunteer worker in the campaign of a candidate for nomination or election to an office filled by election in whole or in part by the qualified voters of his jurisdiction. The restrictions of this paragraph shall apply to paid deputy registrars but shall not apply to unpaid deputy registrars.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-30, 24-35, 24-36, 24-52, 24-52.1, 24-53, 24-55, 24-61, 24-65, 24-66, 24-118.1, 24-199; 1954, c. 691; 1958, c. 576; 1962, c. 475; 1964, c. 608; 1968, cc. 97, 141; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-32, 24.1-34, 24.1-43, 24.1-44; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 12; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1982, cc. 290, 650; 1983, c. 511; 1984, c. 480; 1985, c. 197; 1986, c. 558, § 24.1-33.2; 1988, c. 528; 1989, c. 227; 1993, c. 641; 1995, cc. 835, 848; 1996, c. 308; 2004, cc. 27, 391; 2009, c. 403; 2018, cc. 692, 693; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 482; 2022, c. 140.

Cross references.

As to United States Census population figures for counties and cities of the Commonwealth of Virginia, see the Appendix to Title 15.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 27 and 391, cl. 2 provides: “That the terms of office of general registrars serving on the effective date of this act shall be extended to midnight June 30, 2007.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 27 and 391 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “month of May or June in 2007” for “first week in March 1995” in the first sentence and substituted “July 1, 2007” for “April 1, 1995” in the last sentence; and substituted “30” for “thirty” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 403 inserted the next-to-last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 692 and 693 are identical, and in the first paragraph, added “unless such county or city has a population of 25,000 or less” at the end of the first sentence, deleted “However” at the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 482, effective July 1, 2021, in the first paragraph, rewrote the current first sentence from the former first two sentences, which read: “Each electoral board shall meet in the month of May or June in 2007, and every four years thereafter, and shall appoint a general registrar, who shall be a qualified voter of the county or city for which he is appointed unless such county or city has a population of county or city for which he is appointed unless such county or city has a population of 25,000 or less. In the case of a city that is wholly contained within one county, the city electoral board may appoint a qualified voter of that county to serve as city general registrar or less.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “deputy” for “assistant” twice in the last paragraph.

§ 24.2-111.
Compensation and expenses of general registrars.

The General Assembly shall establish a compensation plan in the general appropriation act for the general registrars. The governing body for the county or city of each general registrar shall pay compensation in accordance with the plan and be reimbursed annually as authorized in the act. The governing body shall be required to provide benefits to the general and deputy registrars and staff as provided to other employees of the locality, and shall be authorized to supplement the salary of the general registrar to the extent provided in the act.

Each locality shall pay the reasonable expenses of the general registrar, including reimbursement for mileage at the rate payable to members of the General Assembly. In case of a dispute, the State Board shall approve or disapprove the reimbursement. Reasonable expenses include, but are not limited to, costs for (i) an adequately trained registrar’s staff, including training in the use of computers and other technology to the extent provided to other local employees with similar job responsibilities, and reasonable costs for the general registrar to receive and maintain certification as required by the State Board pursuant to subsection C of §

24.2-103

; (ii) adequate training for officers of election; (iii) conducting elections as required by this title; and (iv) voter education.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-52, 24-52.1, 24-55, 24-61, 24-65, 24-66, 24-118.1; 1954, c. 691; 1962, c. 475; 1964, c. 608; 1968, cc. 97, 141; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-43; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 12; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1982, c. 290; 1983, c. 511; 1984, c. 480; 1985, c. 197; 1986, c. 558; 1988, c. 528; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2016, c. 13; 2020, c. 1148; 2022, c. 140.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1148, cl. 2 provides: “That any general registrar serving a term that began prior to the effective date of this act shall be required to complete the certification program and receive his certification no later than June 30, 2021.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted “required to provide benefits to the general and assistant registrars and staff as provided to other employees of the locality, and shall be” in the first paragraph, and inserted the last sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 13 deleted “or at least one member of the registrar’s staff” following “reasonable costs for the general registrar” in clause (i) of the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1148 substituted “registrar to receive and maintain certification as required by the State Board pursuant to subsection C of §

24.2-103

” for “registrar to attend the annual training offered by the State Board” in clause (i) of the second paragraph; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “deputy” for “assistant” in the first paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General registrars as “employees.” —

General registrars are “deemed to be employees of the county or city” as used in §

24.2-122

, meaning that a general registrar is bound by the locality’s policies and practices, but only to the extent such policies and practices do not interfere with the orderly function of the registrar’s duties as set by Title 24.2 and the rules and regulations of the Virginia State Board of Elections. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles W. Haney, Chairman, Ms. Mary G. Turner, Secretary, 19-053, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 27 (2/28/20).

General registrars salary and benefits. —

The phrase “shall be required to provide benefits to the general and assistant registrars and staff as provided to other employees of the locality” as used in §

24.2-111

means that although their salaries are determined by compensation plan enacted by the Electoral Board, the locality may provide a general registrar with the same annual raise given to other employees of the locality, but it is not required to do so; unlike salary, however, leave is a “benefit” of employment and as such a locality is required to provide leave retention benefits to a general registrar. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles W. Haney, Chairman, Ms. Mary G. Turner, Secretary, 19-053, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 27 (2/28/20).

Governor may direct the State Board of Elections to reduce reimbursements to localities. —

The Governor has the power to direct the State Board of Elections to reduce the amounts it reimburses localities for the salaries of electoral board members and general registrars in order to achieve legislatively mandated budget savings. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Harry J. Parrish, Member, House of Delegates, 02-050 (6/21/02).

§ 24.2-112.
Deputy registrars; employees.

The electoral board of each county and city shall determine the number of deputy registrars to serve in the office of the general registrar, including any to serve full-time.

In Russell County, there shall be at least one full-time deputy registrar who shall serve in the office of the general registrar.

In any county or city whose population is over 15,500, there shall be at least one deputy registrar who shall serve at least one day each week in the office of the general registrar.

Any county or city whose population is 15,500 or less shall have at least one substitute registrar who is able to take over the duties of the general registrar in an emergency and who shall assist the general registrar when he requests.

The electoral board shall set the term for the deputy registrars; however, their terms shall not extend beyond the term set by law of the incumbent general registrar. The general registrar shall establish the duties of deputy registrars, appoint deputy registrars, and have authority to remove any deputy registrar who fails to discharge the duties of his office.

All deputy registrars shall have the same limitations and qualifications and fulfill the same requirements as the general registrar except that (i) a deputy registrar may be an officer of election and (ii) a deputy registrar shall be a qualified voter of the Commonwealth but is not required to be a qualified voter of the county or city in which he serves as deputy registrar. Candidates who are residents in the county or city for which they seek appointment may be given preference in hiring. Localities may mutually agree to share a deputy registrar among two or more localities. Deputy registrars who agree to serve without pay shall be supervised and trained by the general registrar.

All other employees shall be employed by the general registrar. The general registrar may hire additional temporary employees on a part-time basis as needed.

The compensation of any deputy registrar, other than those who agree to serve without pay, or any other employee of the general registrar shall be fixed and paid by the local governing body and shall be the equivalent of or exceed the minimum hourly wage established by federal law in 29 U.S.C. § 206 (a)(1), as amended.

The general registrar shall not appoint to the office of paid deputy registrar his spouse or any person, or the spouse of any person, who is his parent, grandparent, sibling, child, or grandchild.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-58; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-45; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 470; 1984, c. 480; 1986, c. 558, § 24.1-45.3; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 115; 2001, cc. 637, 638, 642, 643; 2003, c. 232; 2007, c. 813; 2018, c. 465; 2022, c. 140.

Cross references.

As to the 1980, 1990, 2000 and 2010 United States Census population figures for counties and cities of the Commonwealth of Virginia, see the Appendix to Title 15.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 1999 amendment

added the present second paragraph.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 637, 638, and 643 are identical, and in the fifth paragraph inserted the clause (i) designator, and inserted “and (ii) an assistant registrar who serves with pay must be a qualified voter of the Commonwealth but is not required to be a qualified voter of the county or city in which he serves as registrar. Localities may mutually agree to share an assistant registrar among two or more localities.”

The 2001 amendment by c. 642, in the fifth paragraph, inserted the clause (i) designator, and inserted “and (ii) an assistant registrar shall be a qualified voter of the Commonwealth but shall not be required to be a qualified voter of the county or city for which he is appointed. Candidates who are residents in the county or city for which they seek appointment may be given preference in hiring.”

The section is set out as above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 232 deleted “who serves with pay” in clause (ii) of the fifth paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Russell County” for “Any county or city whose population is more than 28,600 but less than 29,000” in the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 465 rewrote the first paragraph, which formerly read: “The electoral board shall determine the number and set the term for assistant registrars; however, their terms shall not extend beyond the term set by law of the incumbent general registrar. The general registrar shall establish the duties of assistant registrars, appoint assistant registrars, and have authority to remove any assistant registrar who fails to discharge the duties of his office”; and inserted the fifth paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted throughout “deputy” or variants for “assistant” or variants; and inserted “deputy” in “in which he serves as deputy registrar” in the sixth paragraph in the first sentence in clause (ii).

§ 24.2-113.
Repealed by Acts 2018, c. 464, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-113

, pertaining to special assistant registrars, derived from Acts 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119, § 24.1-45.1; 1975, c. 515; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-114.
Duties and powers of general registrar.

In addition to the other duties required by this title, the general registrar, and the deputy registrars acting under his supervision, shall:

Maintain the office of the general registrar and establish and maintain additional public places for voter registration in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-412

.

Participate in programs to educate the general public concerning registration and encourage registration by the general public. No registrar shall actively solicit, in a selective manner, any application for registration or for a ballot or offer anything of value for any such application.

Perform his duties within the county or city he was appointed to serve, except that a registrar may (i) go into a county or city in the Commonwealth contiguous to his county or city to register voters of his county or city when conducting registration jointly with the registrar of the contiguous county or city or (ii) notwithstanding any other provision of law, participate in multijurisdictional staffing for voter registration offices, approved by the State Board, that are located at facilities of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Provide the appropriate forms for applications to register and to obtain the information necessary to complete the applications pursuant to the provisions of the Constitution of Virginia and general law.

Indicate on the registration records for each accepted mail voter registration application form returned by mail pursuant to Article 3.1 (§

24.2-416.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 that the registrant has registered by mail. The general registrar shall fulfill this duty in accordance with the instructions of the State Board so that those persons who registered by mail are identified on the registration records, lists of registered voters furnished pursuant to §

24.2-405

, lists of persons who voted furnished pursuant to §

24.2-406

, and pollbooks used for the conduct of elections.

Accept a registration application or request for transfer or change of address submitted by or for a resident of any other county or city in the Commonwealth. Registrars shall process registration applications and requests for transfer or change of address from residents of other counties and cities in accordance with written instructions from the State Board and shall forward the completed application or request to the registrar of the applicant’s residence. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, the registrar of the applicant’s residence shall recognize as timely any application or request for transfer or change of address submitted to any person authorized to receive voter registration applications pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

24.2-400

et seq.), prior to or on the final day of registration. The registrar of the applicant’s residence shall determine the qualification of the applicant, including whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a felony, and if so, under what circumstances the applicant’s right to vote has been restored, and promptly notify the applicant at the address shown on the application or request of the acceptance or denial of his registration or transfer. However, notification shall not be required when the registrar does not have an address for the applicant.

Preserve order at and in the vicinity of the place of registration. For this purpose, the registrar shall be vested with the powers of a conservator of the peace while engaged in the duties imposed by law. He may exclude from the place of registration persons whose presence disturbs the registration process. He may appoint special officers, not exceeding three in number, for a place of registration and may summon persons in the vicinity to assist whenever, in his judgment, it is necessary to preserve order. The general registrar and any deputy registrar shall be authorized to administer oaths for purposes of this title.

Maintain the official registration records for his county or city in the system approved by, and in accordance with the instructions of, the State Board; preserve the written applications of all persons who are registered; and preserve for a period of four years the written applications of all persons who are denied registration or whose registration is cancelled.

If a person is denied registration, notify such person in writing of the denial and the reason for denial within five days of the denial in accordance with §

24.2-422

.

Verify the accuracy of the pollbooks provided for each election by the State Board, make the pollbooks available to the precincts, and according to the instructions of the State Board provide a copy of the data from the pollbooks to the State Board after each election for voting credit purposes.

Retain the pollbooks in his principal office for two years from the date of the election.

Maintain accurate and current registration records and comply with the requirements of this title for the transfer, inactivation, and cancellation of voter registrations.

Whenever election districts, precincts, or polling places are altered, provide for entry into the voter registration system of the proper district and precinct designations for each registered voter whose districts or precinct have changed and notify each affected voter of changes affecting his districts or polling place by mail.

Whenever any part of his county or city becomes part of another jurisdiction by annexation, merger, or other means, transfer to the appropriate general registrar the registration records of the affected registered voters. The general registrar for their new county or city shall notify them by mail of the transfer and their new election districts and polling places.

When he registers any person who was previously registered in another state, notify the appropriate authority in that state of the person’s registration in Virginia by providing electronically, through the Department of Elections, the information contained in that person’s registration application.

Whenever any person is believed to be registered or voting in more than one state or territory of the United States at the same time, inquire about, or provide information from the voter’s registration and voting records to any appropriate voter registration or other authority of another state or territory who inquires about, that person’s registration and voting history.

At the request of the county or city chairman of any political party nominating a candidate for the General Assembly, constitutional office, or local office by a method other than a primary, review any petition required by the party in its nomination process to determine whether those signing the petition are registered voters with active status.

Carry out such other duties as prescribed by the electoral board in his capacity as the director of elections for the locality in which he serves.

Receive and maintain certification through the certification program conducted by the State Board for general registrars pursuant to subsection C of §

24.2-103

. Each general registrar shall be required to receive certification through the certification program within 12 months of his initial appointment or any subsequent reappointment, unless a waiver has been granted by the State Board pursuant to subsection C of §

24.2-103

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-59, 24-60, 24-60.1, 24-71 through 24-73, 24-90, 24-93, 24-94, 24-101, 24-111, 24-115, 24-118; 1950, p. 381; 1958, c. 576; 1962, cc. 422, 536; 1968, c. 143; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-46, 24.1-54, 24.1-68; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1976, c. 616; 1979, c. 329; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 398; 1984, c. 480; 1986, c. 558; 1990, c. 193; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 1998, c. 354; 2000, cc. 512, 556, 857; 2003, c. 1015; 2005, c. 380; 2010, c. 812; 2013, c. 491; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2016, cc. 13, 633; 2019, c. 341; 2020, cc. 857, 1148; 2022, c. 140.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1148, cl. 2 provides: “That any general registrar serving a term that began prior to the effective date of this act shall be required to complete the certification program and receive his certification no later than June 30, 2021.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 512 and 556 are identical, and in subdivision 2, inserted the clause (i) designator and added clause (ii).

The 2000 amendment by c. 857, in subdivision 4, inserted “or request for transfer or change of address” in the first and third sentences; in the second sentence inserted “and requests for transfer or change of address” and inserted “or request” following “application”; and in the fourth sentence inserted “or request” and added “or transfer” at the end of the sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015 rewrote the section.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 380 added subdivision 19.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 812, effective November 1, 2010, in subdivision 10, substituted “provide a copy of the data from the pollbooks” for “return the pollbooks, or transfer a copy of the data from any electronic pollbooks”; and in subdivision 11, substituted “retain” for “After the return of the pollbooks by the State Board, retain.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 491 inserted “including whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a felony, and if so, under what circumstances the applicant’s right to vote has been restored” in the fourth sentence in subdivision 6.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and inserted “in his capacity as the director of elections for the locality in which he serves” in subdivision 18.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 13, in subdivision 19, deleted “or designate one member of his staff to attend,” following “Attend” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2016 amendment by c. 633 added “by providing electronically, through the Department of Elections, the information contained in that person’s registration application” in subdivision 15.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 341, in subdivision 9, deleted “promptly” preceding “notify such person”; and inserted “within 14 days of the denial.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 857, substituted “five days” for “14 days” in subdivision 9.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1148 rewrote subdivision 19, which formerly read: “Attend an annual training program provided by the State Board. A general registrar may designate one member of his staff to attend such training program if he is unable to attend because of a personal or family emergency.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 in the introductory language and in subdivision 7, substituted “deputy” for “assistant.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General registrars as “employees.” —

General registrars are “deemed to be employees of the county or city” as used in §

24.2-122

, meaning that a general registrar is bound by the locality’s policies and practices, but only to the extent such policies and practices do not interfere with the orderly function of the registrar’s duties as set by Title 24.2 and the rules and regulations of the Virginia State Board of Elections. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles W. Haney, Chairman, Ms. Mary G. Turner, Secretary, 19-053, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 27 (2/28/20).

Person previously convicted of felony. —

General registrar may request documentation to confirm the restoration of voting rights to a person previously convicted of a felony. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jean R. Jensen, Secretary, State Board of Elections, 06-048 (10/3/06).

Authority to hire employees. —

Section

24.2-112

authorizes a general registrar, in his discretion, to hire additional temporary, part-time employees when needed and requires the local governing body to compensate such employees as provided for by law.
See opinion of Attorney General to King William County Electoral Board, No. 14-046, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 58 (10/1/14).

“Conduct of elections.” —

Regulations implementing Chapters 9.3, 9.4, and 9.5 of Title 24.2 do not relate to “the conduct of elections and eligibility to vote,” and therefore do not qualify for an exemption from the regulatory process established by the Virginia Administrative Process Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Edgardo Cortes, Commissioner of Elections, No. 14-038, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 56 (10/1/14).